Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 23

Written Personnel Policies

5-23-101. Legislative intent.

It is the legislative intent that all counties in this state have certain minimum written personnel policies in effect in order to assist in maintaining compliance with applicable state and federal laws and to facilitate accurate recordkeeping. This chapter is not intended to affect the present authority within counties to adopt policies in addition to those required by this chapter, nor is it intended to enlarge, diminish or otherwise affect the obligation to comply with current state and federal laws governing personnel matters. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impose any liability on any county government for failure to have written personnel policies in place, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by law.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of local sheriff's civil service board, OAG 98-044, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (2/17/98).

County officials' authority to adopt separate base personnel policies, OAG 98-058, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (3/9/98).

Applicability of department's written personnel policy or legislative base policy, OAG 99-103, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (5/10/99).

To the extent a proposed county employee bill of rights is inconsistent with T.C.A. §§ 8-20-109 and 5-23-101 et seq., it would violate Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 8, OAG 07-137, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 137 (9/24/07).

5-23-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Base personnel policies” means the policies that are required to be adopted under this chapter and that are enumerated in § 5-23-104;

“County employees” means employees of the county as defined under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), as amended;

“County judge” means any judge who employs one (1) or more county employees; and

“County officials” means the county trustee, register of deeds, county clerk, county judges, county clerks of courts, sheriff, assessor of property, county board of education, and the chief administrative officer of the highway or public works department.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of local sheriff's civil service board, OAG 98-044, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (2/17/98).

County officials' authority to adopt separate base personnel policies, OAG 98-058, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (3/9/98).

5-23-103. Adoption of base personnel policies.

Each county official shall adopt base personnel policies, which shall be approved by an attorney as provided in this chapter and filed in the office of the county clerk as provided in this section on or before December 31, 1997. The county official shall submit the base personnel policies to the attorney selected in accordance with § 5-23-105, to be reviewed for compliance with this chapter and other applicable law. In the event that any policy is not approved by such attorney, the county official may challenge the conclusion of the attorney as to such policy and have such policy reviewed by another attorney selected by the county official and paid from the fees of the office or funds budgeted for the office or department, and the conclusion of that attorney shall be final. The county official shall submit the approved policies to the county legislative body for inclusion in the minutes of the body and filing in the office of the county clerk. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the county board of education may employ its own attorney to review and approve its policies, and the board shall submit to the county legislative body with the approved policies acceptable evidence that the policies have been reviewed and are in compliance with this chapter and applicable law. If any county official fails to adopt and file such policies on or before December 31, 1997, the employees of the county official shall be governed by the base personnel policies adopted by the county legislative body pursuant to subsection (d).

Any county official who wishes to discontinue policies that the official has previously adopted under subsection (a) shall submit written notice to the county legislative body for inclusion in the minutes and filing in the office of the county clerk, specifying the effective date of the change. From and after the specified effective date, the employees of such office shall be governed by the base personnel policies adopted by the county legislative body pursuant to subsection (d).

Any county official whose employees are governed by the base personnel policies adopted by the county legislative body shall have the right to adopt separate base personnel policies applicable to the employees of such official's office by filing approved base personnel policies with the county legislative body in the same manner as set out in subsection (a), at the following times:

Once annually, on or before November 30 each year; and

Within thirty (30) days after any amendment to the policies becomes effective.

Such policies shall become effective on the first day of the month following their filing in the office of the county clerk as provided in subsection (a).

The county mayor and the county legislative body shall provide for the adoption of base personnel policies to govern all county employees except those governed by separate base personnel policies adopted as provided in this section.

The county mayor shall submit to the county legislative body for approval a list of all agencies, offices and departments that will be governed by the base personnel policies. This list shall include and shall be limited to all departments, agencies and boards whose funds are handled through the office of the county trustee.

The attorney selected in accordance with § 5-23-105 shall review the list for accuracy and completeness, and shall report such attorney's findings to the county legislative body.

Upon approval of the list, the county mayor shall appoint, subject to the confirmation of the county legislative body, one (1) or more persons to develop the base personnel policies. Such persons may be members of the county legislative body, the county mayor, officials or employees of agencies, offices or departments to be governed by such policies, or other persons having appropriate knowledge and expertise. Such persons shall be appointed and confirmed on or before October 31, 1997.

The policies shall be prepared and submitted to an attorney for review as provided in § 5-23-105, and upon approval by the attorney they shall be presented to the county legislative body for approval on or before March 1, 1998.

The county legislative body shall either approve or disapprove the policies as a whole. If the policies are not approved, they shall be returned to the originating person or group for revision and resubmission to the county legislative body.

When approved, the policies shall be included in the minutes of the county legislative body and filed in the office of the county clerk, and the policies shall be effective on the first day of the month following approval by the county legislative body. The final policies shall be approved by the county legislative body and filed in the minutes in the office of the county clerk on or before May 31, 1998.

Any governmental agency or entity whose funds are not handled through the office of the county trustee may, by action of the governing board of such agency or entity, adopt for such agency or entity the personnel policies filed in the office of the county clerk in accordance with this subsection (d).

Upon completion of the base personnel policies in accordance with subsection (d), a county mayor may adopt separate base personnel policies applicable to the employees of the county mayor's individual office by filing approved base personnel policies with the county legislative body in the same manner established in subsection (a).

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 3; 1998, ch. 596, §§ 1, 3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of local sheriff's civil service board, OAG 98-044, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (2/17/98).

Holidays on which county offices may be closed, OAG 98-058, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (3/9/98).

County officials' authority to adopt separate base personnel policies, OAG 98-058, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (3/9/98).

Applicability of department's written personnel policy or legislative base policy, OAG 99-103, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (5/10/99).

Where county commission has hired an employee in the valid exercise of its authority, a county mayor may not unilaterally terminate that employee unless expressly authorized. Nor may a county mayor defund or abolish an entire county department without the approval of the county commission. OAG 14-28, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/7/14).

5-23-104. Required provisions.

The base personnel policies required under this chapter are:

Whether employees are entitled to paid vacation or annual leave, sick leave, or other leave, policies for accrual and use of such leave, policies for compliance with state and federal family and medical leave laws, and provisions for maintaining leave records;

The compensatory time policy in effect for the office or department or a statement that no compensatory time is allowed, a statement of whether the salary received by salaried employees is intended to cover all hours worked up to and including forty (40) hours in a work week in offices or departments where the regular work week is less than forty (40) hours, policies for maintaining compliance with the overtime provisions of the federal wage and hour laws, and provisions for recordkeeping;

Policies on non-discrimination and sexual harassment, including a complaint procedure as required under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 — 12213), and guidelines to enable compliance with the fair hiring requirements of the federal equal employment opportunity laws and regulations. For employees of county judges, procedures administered by the administrative office of the courts for complaints under the Americans with Disabilities Act; and

For any employees who are required by law to be tested, policies and procedures for drug testing or alcohol testing, or both.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of local sheriff's civil service board, OAG 98-044, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (2/17/98).

County officials' authority to adopt separate base personnel policies, OAG 98-058, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (3/9/98).

Applicability of department's written personnel policy or legislative base policy, OAG 99-103, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (5/10/99).

Collateral References.

Adequacy of notice to employer of need for leave under Federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993. 184 A.L.R. Fed. 171.

Validity, construction, and application of state family-, parental-, or medical-leave acts. 57 A.L.R.5th 477.

5-23-105. Retainer of attorney.

The county mayor shall retain an attorney, subject to confirmation of the county legislative body, to review the base personnel policies for compliance with this chapter and other applicable law. The county mayor may, but is not required to, retain the county attorney in such capacity. The compensation of the attorney shall be established by the county legislative body, and shall be paid from the county general fund.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 5; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-23-106. Modification of policy.

Once adopted and approved as provided in this chapter, personnel policies may be amended, modified, enlarged or repealed at any time by the same process used for original adoption. Any and all personnel policies governing county employees shall be subject to change at any time, and shall not give rise to any contractual rights or obligations between the county and its employees.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 6.

5-23-107. Duties of county officials and department heads.

Each county official and each department head within the county is responsible, with respect to the employees of that office or department, for:

Ensuring that each employee under such person's direction has received a copy of the personnel policies in effect for that office, including a statement that nothing in the policies is intended to create a contract of employment or to affect the employment-at-will status of county employees, and a statement for each employee to sign acknowledging receipt of a copy of the policies for that employee's office or department, and acknowledging that the employee understands that subsequent amendments will be on file at the office of the county clerk; provided, that a local board of education may, by resolution or memorandum of understanding pursuant to title 49, chapter 5, part 6, dispense with the requirements of this subdivision (1) and instead adopt other appropriate measures to ensure that each employee has knowledge of and access to a copy of personnel policies of the school system and any subsequent amendments applicable to them. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to enlarge, modify or repeal the rights of employees of local boards of education as set forth in title 49.

Furnishing to each employee a copy of § 39-16-504, relative to falsifying, destroying, or tampering with governmental records;

Maintaining all required personnel records, including, but not limited to, the form I-9 required under federal immigration laws and all wage and hour records required under state or federal law, unless such records are maintained in a central payroll office within the county; and

Ensuring that all posters and other employee notifications required by the Federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), the Family and Medical Leave Act (29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.), applicable equal employment opportunity laws, and other applicable state or federal laws have been posted or otherwise given to employees.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 7; 1998, ch. 773, § 1; 2011, ch. 378, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 378, § 4 provided that nothing in the act, which amended subdivision (1), shall be construed to abridge or impair a contract or agreement governing terms and conditions of professional service entered into by a board of education and a recognized professional employees' organization under the Education Professional Negotiations Act before June 1, 2011. Any such contract or agreement shall remain in full force and effect until the expiration of the contract or agreement.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of department's written personnel policy or legislative base policy, OAG 99-103, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (5/10/99).

5-23-108. Existing authority to be retained by officials.

Elected or appointed officials, boards and department heads shall retain their present authority to make decisions and adopt policies that are not in conflict with this chapter, including, but not limited to, matters concerning hiring, compensation, promotions, transfers, layoffs, discipline, termination, and other employment matters for the employees of their respective offices. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorization for establishing systems of seniority, tenure, or classified service, nor for creating contracts of employment or establishing the terms thereof. Nothing in this chapter or any of the policies adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be construed to affect the employment-at-will status of any county employee or otherwise create any contractual obligation on the part of the county as employer.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 8.

5-23-109. Actions by counties against official or employee in derogation of chapter.

If a court finds a county liable as a result of acts or omissions by any official or employee in connection with the requirements of this chapter or any policies adopted pursuant to this chapter, then the county shall have a right of action for reimbursement against the official or employee whose conduct resulted in liability for the county not covered by insurance, where the conduct of the official or employee was intentional and knowing and constituted illegal behavior in the workplace. For purposes of this section, the words “intentional” and “knowing” have the same meanings as defined in § 39-11-302. An official's or employee's conduct shall not constitute knowing or intentional illegal conduct in the workplace if the conduct was based on the written advice or opinion of the county attorney or the official's or employee's legal counsel.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 9.

5-23-110. Mandamus to compel compliance.

In order to enforce this chapter, the county mayor is authorized to retain the county attorney, or an attorney hired pursuant to § 5-6-112, to seek mandamus to compel compliance as provided in § 5-1-107, and additionally may pursue any and all other remedies available at law or in equity.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 10; 1998, ch. 596, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-23-111. Compliance with Title VI.

No expenditure of public funds pursuant to this chapter shall be made in violation of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000d).

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 13.

5-23-112. Applicability.

This chapter is intended to supersede any conflicting general laws or private acts; provided, that this chapter shall not apply to any county with a population over eight hundred thousand (800,000) or any county that has adopted a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1997, ch. 361, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of local sheriff's civil service board, OAG 98-044, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (2/17/98).